Illinois, session 104th, SB1045.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Drug School Act is amended by changing 5Section 1 as follows: 6    (55 ILCS 130/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the Drug 8School Act.9(Source: P.A. 95-160, eff. 1-1-08.)